California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Notwithstanding Section 55461, every processor who handles freestone peaches for freezing and drying in California shall furnish to the director, on or before December 10 of each year, and every processor who handles walnuts, raisins, or prunes in California annually shall furnish to the director, on or before August 31 of each year, on forms provided by the director, the reporting information specified below showing the number of tons purchased by the processor in that marketing season. In the report, the tonnage shall be broken down by at least major varieties and weighted average price paid for the tonnage acquired (including any bonuses or allowances) and may contain other information required by the director, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) For walnuts, including inshell acquisitions and shelling stock acquisitions, the color, size, percentage of edible yield, and percentage of offgrade.

(b) For raisins, the percentage of mold, moisture content, sand, offgrade, or micro-organisms on offgrade acquisitions.

(c) For prunes, by size and percentage offgrade.

(d) For freestone peaches, by type of utilization on a fresh weight basis and percentage of offgrade.

The above reporting shall be on a statewide basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.8.

(a) The secretary shall not release, or otherwise make available, any information furnished by a cooperative or an individual processor under Section 55601.7 or this section, including information relating to the weighted average prices paid, except in proceedings brought against the processor by the secretary for the purpose of enforcing this section.

(b) The secretary shall (1) enforce the collection of the information required in Section 55601.7, (2) on or before January 15, publish a summary report for freestone peaches used for freezing and drying and, (3) on or before October 20, publish a summary report for walnuts, raisins, and prunes, reflecting the statistics derived from the processor reports. The summary reports shall include summaries of all information required to be furnished to the secretary.

(c) The secretary may dispense with the reporting requirements and his or her duties to enforce the collection of this information and the publishing of summary reports if the secretary determines that the same or similar information is made public information within the same time periods of subdivision (b) by any federal or state committee or organization responsible for regulating the handling of any of the commodities subject to this section.

(d) (1) To provide funds to carry out Section 55601.7 and this section, each processor, including agricultural cooperatives, subject to these reporting requirements shall pay to the secretary the amount determined by the secretary to be necessary to cover these costs, but not to exceed twelve cents ($0.12) per fresh ton for freestone peaches, twelve cents ($0.12) per dry ton for raisins and prunes, and twelve cents ($0.12) per inshell dry ton for walnuts handled by the processor during each marketing season.

(2) (A) The amount of the fee for freestone peaches used for freezing and drying shall be paid to the secretary on or before December 10 for all freestone peaches used for freezing and drying received from April 1 through November 30.

(B) The amount of the fee for any freestone peaches used for freezing and drying received from December 1 to March 31, inclusive, shall be paid to the secretary on or before May 1 of the next marketing season.

(C) The amount of the fee shall be paid to the secretary on or before May 1 of each year for all other commodities received from September 1 to March 31, inclusive.

(D) The amount of the fee for any other commodity received from April 1 to August 31, inclusive, shall be paid to the secretary on or before September 1 of the next marketing season.

(3) The secretary may fix the fee at a lesser amount and may adjust the fee from marketing season to marketing season. Any processor who fails, neglects, or refuses to pay the required fee is in violation of this chapter. Any such processor shall not pass the penalty on to the producer of the commodity.

(4) All funds received under this subdivision shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(e) If the secretary finds that any processor has failed, refused, or neglected to provide the information required by this section, the secretary may proceed in accordance with Article 11 (commencing with Section 55721).

(f) Any cooperative subject to the reporting provisions of this section shall, in lieu of reporting prices, report all advances and other payments made as of the reporting date and its good faith estimate of the market value of the commodity for the crop year.

(g) The willful failure of any processor to report to the secretary, as required by this section, is a violation of this chapter and is a separate and distinct violation of this chapter for each day the processor fails to meet the reporting requirements.

(h) For the purpose of Section 55601.7 and this section, “marketing season” means the crop year that runs from September 1 to August 31, inclusive, for walnuts, raisins, and prunes, and the crop year that runs from April 1 to March 31, inclusive, for freestone peaches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 135, Sec. 3.   Effective July 28, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55602.

Every processor except a licensed winegrower, that purchases for freezing any farm product from the producer of the farm product on a packout basis shall promptly upon completion of the processing of each lot or day’s delivery inform the producer of the results obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55603.

If a specific grade or quality is a condition of a packout basis contract between the producer and the processor, such grade or quality shall be determined at the completion of the processing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55604.

Every contract between a processor and a producer which covers the purchase of any farm product on a packout basis shall designate the price to be paid for each grade purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55604.1.

Where the processor is operating under continuous United States Department of Agriculture inspection, the United States Department of Agriculture grade determination shall be accepted as final in accounting to the producer.

Where the processor is not operating under continuous United States Department of Agriculture inspection, any dispute as to grade shall be settled by lot inspection to be made by the United States Department of Agriculture. In the event any lot is shipped within 30 days of processing, the processor shall draw representative samples in accordance with United States Department of Agriculture sampling procedures, and the samples shall be held for a period of not less than 30 days from the date of processing for the inspection if necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55604.2.

The provisions of Section 55581 of the Agricultural Code and Section 12713 of the Business and Professions Code do not apply to farm products purchased and accounted for on a packout basis, pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55605.

Every processor, except a licensed winegrower, that receives any farm product from the producer of the farm product for processing on a consigned basis shall promptly make and keep a correct record which shows in detail all of the following with reference to the processing, handling, storage, and sale of such farm product:

(a) The name and address of the consignor.

(b) The date received.

(c) The quantity received.

(d) The size of the containers into which the finished product is packed.

(e) The grade and quality of the finished product.

(f) The price which is obtained from the sale of the finished product.

(g) An itemized statement of costs and charges which the processor paid in connection with the processing, handling, storage, and sale of the farm product. Any services rendered for which charges are made, if not filed with the director, shall be charged at cost, if not covered by a written contract. Cost-supporting data shall be available for verification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

55606.

If the processor has entered into a contract with two or more producers or consignors, which provides that the returns for any farm product which is handled and sold for the account of such producers or consignors shall be pooled on a definite basis as to grade or quality, or both, during a specific period of time, then the processor shall render a true account of sale which shows the net average pool return on each grade and quality from the sales that are made, which shows in detail all charges in connection with the handling, processing, and selling of such farm product. The processor shall keep a correct record of such sales and charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55607.

Every processor shall keep accurate books and records which show the name and address of any producer that is selling and making delivery of any farm product to him, including the dates of deliveries, the quantities of the farm product which is delivered, and the agreed price to be paid for such farm product. If no agreed price has been arrived at, or a method for determining it agreed upon, such agreed price shall be considered the value of such product as of date of delivery. For the purpose of ascertaining such value and in addition to other evidence, reference may be had to price quotations from the federal-state market news service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55608.

Accurate grading and weight receipts shall be given by all processors to each producer, or his agent, upon each and every delivery. Each receipt shall state all of the following:

(a) The date of the receipt.

(b) The name and address of the producer.

(c) The name of the processor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55609.

Not later than five days after demand, the processor shall give to every such producer so requesting a full and complete statement of such producer’s account, which shows all of the following:

(a) The entire quantities of the product which has been delivered by the producer.

(b) The grades of the product which has been delivered by the producer.

(c) The amount which is owing for every lot and for the total amount of the product which has been delivered by the producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55609.1.

Remittance in full of the amount which is realized from such sales, including all collections, overcharges, and damages, less the agreed commission and other charges, together with a complete account of sales, shall be made to the consignor within 10 days after receipt of the moneys by the consignee, unless otherwise agreed in writing.

The burden of proof is upon the consignee to prove the correctness of his accounting as to any transaction which may be questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

55610.

A processor, in order to prevent loss or economic waste, may resell or redeliver any raw product purchased and received from the producer of the raw product to another processor for the purpose of processing and such act is not an act which requires licensing pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) of this division. The processor who resells or redelivers any raw product remains liable to the producer for the full value of the raw product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55611.

All records required to be kept under this chapter shall be kept for a period of four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

55613.

(a) If the secretary determines by February 1 of any year, commencing in 1992, that an acreage survey of the grape crop is desired by the processors and producers of grapes for wine, and if the producers and processors of grapes for raisins and the producers and packers of grapes for fresh market use agree to pay their proportionate share of the cost of the survey, as determined by the secretary, the secretary shall conduct the survey. The secretary shall implement subdivision (e) of Section 55601.6 to fund the wine industry’s proportionate costs of the survey. If an acreage survey is conducted, the results of the survey shall be printed and made available on or before May 30 of the year in which it is conducted.

(b) The department shall reimburse any processor or producer of grapes for wine to cover the costs incurred by any of those persons to fund the wine industry’s proportionate share of an acreage survey in 1991, from funds collected pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 55601.6.

(c) For purposes of this section, “acreage survey” means an accumulation of plant removals, new plantings, and graftings to provide reliable information on the changing character of the state’s grape industry. This information shall be tabulated for each county and on a statewide basis and for each variety of grapes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 737, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Producer’s Lien [55631. - 55653.]

55631.

(a) Every producer of any farm product that sells any product that is grown by him or her to any processor under contract, express or implied, in addition to all other rights and remedies that are provided for by law, has a lien upon that product and upon all processed or manufactured forms of that farm product for his or her labor, care, and expense in growing and harvesting that product. The lien shall be to the extent of the agreed price, if any, for that product so sold. If there is no agreed price or a method for determining the price that is agreed upon, the extent of the lien is the value of the farm product as of the date of the delivery. Any portion of that product or the processed or manufactured forms of that product, in excess of the amount necessary to satisfy the total amount owed to producers under contract, shall
 be free and clear of that lien.

(b) Every producer of a flower, agricultural, or vegetable seed that sells seed that is grown by him or her, when the seed was purchased or supplied by the grower and not supplied by the dealer or an independent third party who paid for the seed, to any seed dealer under contract, express or implied, in addition to all other rights and remedies that are provided for by law, has a lien upon that product and upon all processed or manufactured forms of that product for his or her labor, care, and expense in growing and harvesting that product. The lien shall be to the extent of the agreed price, if any, for that product so sold. If there is no agreed price or a method for determining the price that is agreed upon, the extent of the lien is the value of that product as of the date of the delivery. Any portion of that product or the processed or manufactured forms of that product, in excess of the amount necessary to
 satisfy the total amount owed to producers under contract, shall be free and clear of that lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 144.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

55631.5.

Notwithstanding Section 55461, a nonprofit cooperative association acting as a producer bargaining association may assert producer’s lien rights for, or on behalf of, its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1109, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

55632.

This producer’s lien attaches on all of such delivered product from the date of delivery of such farm product or any portion of it by a producer to any processor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55633.

The producer’s lien is a preferred lien prior in dignity to all other liens, claims, or encumbrances except the following:

(a) Labor claims for wages and salaries for personal services which are rendered by any person to any processor in connection with such processing business after the delivery of any such product for processing.

(b) The lien of a warehouseman as provided by Division 7 (commencing with Section 7101) of the Uniform Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

55634.

Every lien which is provided for in this article is on every farm product and any processed form of the farm product which is in the possession of the processor without segregation of the product. For purposes of this chapter, any and all farm products or processed form of farm products deposited by a processor with a warehouse, whether or not warehouse receipts are given as security to a lender, shall be considered as being in the possession of the processor and subject to the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1109, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

55635.

The lien of a producer, unless sooner released by payment or by security which is given for the payment as provided in this article, attaches from the date of delivery of the product, or if there is a series of deliveries, it attaches from the date of the last delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1109, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

55636.

If suit is commenced by any such producer to enforce any lien, such lien shall remain in effect until one of the following occurs:

(a) The payment of the agreed price or the value of such product.

(b) Deposit of the amount of the lien or claims with the clerk of the court in which any such action is pending.

(c) The final determination of such court proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

55637.

Any lien on any product or processed product may, however, be released, to the extent the value of the claim upon such product is secured, by a surety bond or a cash deposit or other security given as provided in this article. Any producer may also release any lien which is possessed by him upon payment being made to him for the agreed or reasonable value of the product which is so sold and delivered, or upon arrangements being made for such payment which are satisfactory to the producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55638.

It is unlawful for any processor to remove, from this state or beyond his ownership or control, any farm product which is delivered to him, or any processed form of the farm product, to which any of the liens provided for in this chapter has attached, except for any of such product or processed product as may be in excess of a quantity on hand which is of a value that is sufficient to satisfy all existing liens. Furthermore, this section shall not prohibit the sale of any farm product or processed form of the product to which such a lien has attached, so long as the total proceeds of the sale are used to satisfy obligations to producers which are secured by a lien established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

55638.5.

The director, within 15 days of the filing of a verified complaint by a producer, shall investigate any charge that a purchaser of a farm product to which a lien has attached has removed any farm product, or any processed form of a farm product, in violation of Section 55638.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1109, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

55639.

Any processor that desires to secure a release of any or all of such liens on any product or processed product may do so in any of the following ways:

(a) By paying the agreed or actual value of any farm product which is purchased by such processor within 20 days from the date of delivery of the farm product unless the date of payment is otherwise agreed upon in writing or such payment is secured other than by lien.

(b) By depositing with the director a surety bond which is executed by such processor as principal and by a surety company which is qualified and authorized to do business in this state as surety in an amount which equals the current market value of the product or processed product which is intended by such processor to be sold or otherwise disposed of, as such value may appear by the sworn statement of such processor in accordance with quotations from the federal-state market news service or other evidence which is satisfactory to the director. The bond shall be conditioned that if the processor fails to pay up to the amount of such bond the lawful claims of all producers whose liens have been released by the bond, within 35 days after date of the bond, the surety shall be liable to and shall pay to the state on behalf of such claimants all such lawful claims as may be covered by the amount of the bond, together with costs of suit if an action is filed on the bond.

(c) By depositing with the director a cash sum in lawful money of the United States which is expressly set apart by an instrument in writing that is signed by the processor for the purpose of guaranteeing to the extent of such sum, payment of all existing claims of producers whose liens are released by the deposit, within 35 days from the date of such deposit. The director shall be named in such instrument as trustee to carry out the purpose and intent of the instrument. 

(d) By designating, setting apart, and depositing in a public warehouse a quantity of any processed farm products and indorsing over to the director and delivering to him the warehouse receipt for such products for the purpose of guaranteeing to the extent of the value of such deposit, payment within 35 days from the date of such deposit, all existing claims of producers and labor claimants whose liens are released by it.

(e) By securing a release from the director after payment in full for such farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55640.

If all lawful claims of the producers have been paid in accordance with this article by any processor, any product which is released by such action may be sold, transported, or otherwise disposed of.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55641.

If a bond, cash deposit, or security is given to the director by any processor as provided in this article, such processor may sell, transport, or otherwise dispose of the product or processed product to the value which is represented by such security as such value may appear by the sworn statement of such processor in accordance with quotations from the federal-state market news service or other evidence satisfactory to the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55642.

The director may accept such bond, if approved by him, and such other security. If the claims or any of them are not paid in accordance with the condition of such security, the director may, on proof being made to his satisfaction of the amounts which are due such claimants, pay all such unpaid claims insofar as possible out of the deposit money, or proceeds from any sale made by him of any securities or processed products which are given as security.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55643.

If a bond has been given as security, the director shall notify the principal and surety of any default on the part of the principal under the bond, and make demand for payment on behalf of such unpaid claimants. If payment is not made, the director may take any legal action he may deem necessary to enforce payment under such bond.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55644.

If the director has received warehouse receipts for any processed product as security, and the processor giving them has failed to pay the claims in accordance with the terms of such security, the director may sell such security with or without notice, and in such manner as he shall determine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55645.

All claims in relation to payment shall have equal standing and payment shall be prorated if necessary among the claimants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55646.

This article does not prevent the director if in his opinion the rights of all of the claimants are fully protected, as provided for in this article, from issuing a certificate in the name of the department and signed by him which releases any specific lot or quantity of any product or processed product from all liens of the claimants. No security which is held by the director shall, however, be released by him to any processor unless and until it is made to appear to his satisfaction that all claims have been fully paid, or that the rights of all of the claimants are fully protected.

A fee of five dollars ($5) shall be paid to the director for issuing any certificate or release which is provided for in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55647.

This article does not impair or affect the right of any claimant that possesses a lien to maintain a personal action to recover such debt against a processor, either in an action to foreclose his lien or in a separate action. He is not required to state in his affidavit to procure an attachment that his demand is not secured by a lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55648.

The judgment, if any, which is obtained by the plaintiff in such personal action, or personal judgment which is obtained in such lien action, does not impair or merge any lien right or claim which is held by such plaintiff. Any money, however, which is collected on the judgment shall be credited on the amount of such lien or claims in any action which is brought to enforce the lien or in any action which is filed pursuant to this article by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55649.

In an action that is filed by any such lien claimant, the defendant processor may file with the court in which the action is pending a surety bond in an amount that is sufficient to cover the demand of plaintiff’s complaint, including the costs, whereupon the court may order the release of a portion or the whole of any product or processed product upon which the lien of plaintiff has attached.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

55650.

Such processor may also, on motion duly noticed, introduce evidence to the court before whom any such action is pending to the effect that he has sufficient security or money on deposit with the director to protect the lien or other rights of plaintiff. If he does so, the court may order the release of a portion or the whole of such product upon which the lien of plaintiff is attached, and deny to plaintiff any recovery in such action. Such action by the court does not, however, prejudice any other rights or remedies which are possessed by the plaintiff.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55651.

The plaintiff in an action which is brought to foreclose any of the liens which are provided for in this article may, in a proper case, and upon proper allegations, secure an injunction against the processor in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to restrain the doing of any acts on the part of such processor which are designed to or which would, in effect, remove any processed product in his possession or under his control and upon which valid liens exist, beyond the process of the court, to plaintiff’s injury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55652.

If in a court proceeding to foreclose such lien, it is found and determined by the court that there is no cash, bond, or other deposit placed with the director as security for the payment of any of the lien claims as set out in the complaint, the judgment of foreclosure shall be against a sufficient quantity in value of such farm product or processed product in the possession or under the control of the defendant processor, as may be necessary to satisfy such claim or render judgment and declare forfeited any bond which is deposited in the court by such processor to secure the lawful claims of the plaintiff as determined by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55653.

All actions filed by the director or producers against any processor for the foreclosure of the liens or other security which are provided for in this article may be consolidated by the court and all persons that are necessary to a determination of such action may be made parties to such actions. Any judgment which is rendered shall determine the lawfulness of the amount of each claim as represented by the pleadings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Liens on Livestock Sold or Delivered to Meatpackers [55701. - 55704.]

55701.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Livestock” means any cattle, sheep, swine, goat, or any horse, mule, or other equine, whether living or dead.

(b) “Meatpacker” means an establishment where livestock are either slaughtered, the carcasses thereof are prepared, or meat is processed and where state or federal inspection is maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

55702.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person who sells or furnishes livestock to a meatpacker, shall have a lien, not dependent upon possession, on the livestock and upon the identifiable proceeds and products thereof, for the unpaid part of the purchase price, or for the unpaid value of the livestock at the time of the transfer of possession if no purchase price has been agreed upon. The lien shall commence on the date of the transfer of possession of the livestock to the meatpacker and shall have priority over all other liens upon, and security interests in, the livestock and the identifiable proceeds and products thereof, without regard to the time of attachment or perfection of such other liens or security interests and shall remain a lien upon the livestock and the identifiable proceeds and products thereof notwithstanding sale, exchange, or other disposition thereof.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), a buyer in the ordinary course of business, as that term is defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of the Commercial Code, shall take free of such lien even though the buyer knows of the existence of the lien.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), the lien shall cease to be of any force or effect after the expiration of 21 days from the date of delivery of the livestock unless a notice of lien is filed pursuant to subdivision (e), in which case the lien shall remain effective as long as such notice shall remain effective.

(d) No person shall have a lien pursuant to subdivision (a) to the extent that the person shall have made the livestock available to the meatpacker on credit terms.

(e) Any person selling or delivering livestock who claims a lien under this article shall file a statement with the Secretary of State and a copy thereof with the director, both within 21 days after delivery of the livestock to the meatpacker. The statement shall be in writing, verified by the oath of the person filing, and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person filing.

(2) A statement of the amount demanded by the person filing the statement after deducting all credits and offsets.

(3) The name and address of the meatpacker who received the livestock.

(4) A description of the livestock delivered to the meatpacker and the date of delivery.

(5) A statement that the amount claimed is a true and bona fide existing debt as of the date of the statement.

(6) A statement that the amount claimed is a true and bona fide existing debt as of the date on which payment was due for the livestock.

(f) Every statement that is filed shall be accompanied by the fees required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code in the case of a financing statement not on the standard form and shall remain effective for a period of five years from the date of filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

55703.

Except as provided in this section, any lien created under Section 55702 shall continue in force for a period of five years from the date of filing of the notice of lien. The lien shall cease at the expiration of five years unless the claimant thereof, or his assignee, or successor in interest, brings suit to foreclose the lien, in which case the lien continues in force until such lien foreclosure suit is finally determined and closed. If such foreclosure proceeding is not prosecuted to trial within two years after the commencement thereof, the court may in its discretion dismiss the foreclosure suit.

The plaintiff in any such lien foreclosure suit may have the property upon which such lien subsists attached, as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.

Any number of persons claiming liens under this article may join in the same action and when separate actions are commenced, the court may consolidate them. Whenever the sale of the property subject to any lien or liens provided for in this article, under the judgment or decree of foreclosure of such lien or liens, results in a deficiency of proceeds, the proceeds shall be divided pro rata among the lien claimants whose liens are established, regardless of the order in which the liens were created or the order in which the suits to foreclose same were commenced, and the judgment or decree for the deficiency may be docketed against the party personally liable therefor and his sureties, in the same manner and with the same effect as in actions for the foreclosure of security interests.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to impair or affect the right of any person to whom any debt may be due for livestock sold or delivered to maintain a personal action to recover such debt against the person liable therefor, or his sureties, either in connection with a suit to foreclose the lien or in a separate action. Any person bringing such personal action may take out a separate attachment therefor, notwithstanding his lien or the amount of his debt. In the affidavit to procure an attachment pursuant to such personal action, such person shall state that the attachment is made pursuant to this section, and the judgment, if any, obtained by the plaintiff in such personal action shall not be construed to impair or merge any lien held by such person under this article. Any money collected on such personal judgment shall be credited on the amount of such lien in any action brought to enforce the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

55704.

Any rights or remedies granted to a person who sells livestock pursuant to this article, are in addition to any other rights or remedies provided by law for such seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Examinations and Audits of the Books and Records of Licensees [55721. - 55725.]

55721.

(a) If, in the opinion of the department, there appears to be reasonable grounds for investigating a complaint or notification made under the provisions of this chapter, the department shall investigate the complaint or notification. In the course of the investigation, if the department determines that violations of this chapter are indicated other than alleged violations specified in the complaint or notification that served as the basis for the investigation, the department may expand the investigation to include the additional violations.

(b) In the opinion of the department, if an investigation substantiates the existence of violations of this chapter, the department may cause a complaint to be issued.

(c) The investigation may include, but shall not be construed to require, examinations and audits of the books and records of any processor that pertain to the solvency of the processor of, or to the purchase of, or to the handling and accounting for, any farm product that is purchased or received on a pack-out or other basis from the producer of the farm product. The department may examine and audit all pertinent books, records, weight certificates, receipts, ledgers, journals, papers, contracts, bank statements, canceled checks and other documents of the processor that show or tend to show facts regarding the financial condition and the number and status of accounts of growers and others that are doing business with the processor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55722.

If the examination discloses evidence of any violation of this chapter, the department may issue a complaint detailing the charges and the discipline sought in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55722.5.

(a) (1) An aggrieved grower or licensee with a complaint that is not subject to the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.) may seek resolution of that complaint by filing a complaint with the department within nine months from the date a complete account of sales was due. The complaint shall be accompanied by two copies of all documents in the complainant’s possession that are relevant to establishing the complaint, a filing fee in the amount specified in the fee schedule set forth in paragraph (2), and a written denial of jurisdiction from the appropriate federal agency unless the commodity involved clearly does not fall under either the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C.